Massachusetts, session 194th, H3884.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding, after section 5A, the following section :- 
"Section 5B. (a) The department of veteran services shall consider the full reimbursement 
of expenses incurred by a veteran with 100% disability rating for emergency medical 
transportation services to local hospitals or veteran’s affairs hospitals. Said veteran shall be 
responsible for providing proof of disability, within a reasonable amount of time, considering the 
medical condition of the veteran."